Washington statutes.
RCW 24.24.100

Fees.

The secretary of state shall file such articles of incorporation or amendment thereto in the secretary of state's office and issue a certificate of incorporation or amendment, as the case may be, to such fraternal association upon the payment of a fee established by the secretary of state under RCW 23.95.260.

[ 2015 c 176 s 9118; 1993 c 269 s 11; 1982 c 35 s 167; 1927 c 190 s 10; RRS s 3887-10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Effective date—1993 c 269: See note following RCW 23.86.070.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.